Tennessee statutes. Title 37 Juveniles
Part 1 General Provisions
37-1-159. Appeals.

The juvenile court shall be a court of record; and any appeal from any final order or judgment in a delinquency proceeding, filed under this chapter, except a proceeding pursuant to § 37-1-134, may be made to the criminal court or court having criminal jurisdiction that shall hear the testimony of witnesses and try the case de novo. However, if the child pleads guilty or no contest in a delinquency or unruly proceeding, the child waives the right to appeal the adjudication. If the plea includes an agreement as to disposition, the child also waives the right to appeal the disposition. Any appeal from any final order or judgment in an unruly child proceeding or dependent and neglect proceeding, filed under this chapter, may be made to the circuit court that shall hear the testimony of witnesses and try the case de novo. The appeal shall be perfected within ten (10) days, excluding nonjudicial days, following the entry of the juvenile court's order. If a hearing before a judge of a matter heard by a magistrate is not requested or provided pursuant to § 37-1-107, the date of the expiration of the time within which to request the hearing shall be the date of disposition for appeal purposes, and the parties and their attorneys shall be so notified by the magistrate. If there is a rehearing by the judge, the appeal period shall commence the day after the order of disposition is entered. All parties to the juvenile court proceeding shall be parties to the de novo appeal.

An appeal does not suspend the order of the juvenile court, nor does it release the child from the custody of that court or of that person, institution or agency to whose care the child has been committed. Pending the hearing, the criminal court or circuit court may make the same temporary disposition of the child as is vested in juvenile courts; provided, that until the criminal court or circuit court has entered an order for temporary disposition, the order of the juvenile court shall remain in effect. A juvenile court shall retain jurisdiction to the extent needed to complete any reviews or permanency hearings for children in foster care as may be mandated by federal or state law.

When an appeal has been perfected, the juvenile court shall cause the entire record in the case, including the juvenile court's findings and written reports from probation officers, professional court employees or professional consultants, to be taken forthwith to the criminal court or circuit court whose duty it is, either in term or in vacation, to set the case for an early hearing. When an appeal is taken from a juvenile court's decision that involves the removal of a child or children from the custody of their natural or legal parents or guardian or from the department of children's services, or when the decision appealed involves the deprivation of a child's liberty as the result of a finding that such child engaged in criminal activity, such hearing shall be held within forty-five (45) days of receipt of the findings and reports. In its order, the criminal court or circuit court shall remand the case to the juvenile court for enforcement of the judgment rendered by the criminal court or circuit court. Appeals from an order of the criminal court or circuit court pursuant to this subsection (c) may be carried to the court of appeals as provided by law.

There is no civil or interlocutory appeal from a juvenile court's disposition pursuant to § 37-1-134. If and only if a nonlawyer judge presides at the transfer hearing in juvenile court, then the criminal court, upon motion of the child filed within ten (10) days of the juvenile court order, excluding nonjudicial days, shall hold a hearing as expeditiously as possible to determine whether it will accept jurisdiction over the child; provided, that if no such motion is filed with the criminal court within the ten-day period, excluding nonjudicial days, such child shall be subject to indictment, presentment or information for the offense charged and thus subject to trial as an adult. At this hearing, which is de novo, the criminal court shall consider:

Any written reports from professional court employees, professional consultants as well as the testimony of any witnesses; and

Those issues considered by the juvenile court pursuant to § 37-1-134(a) and (b).

Following a hearing held pursuant to subsection (d), the criminal court may:

Remand the child to the jurisdiction of the juvenile court for further proceedings and disposition pursuant to § 37-1-131, such remand order reciting in detail the court's findings of fact and conclusions of law; or

Enter an order certifying that it has taken jurisdiction over the child. This order shall recite, in detail, the court's finding of fact and conclusions of law. Following the order, the child shall be subject to indictment, presentment or information for the offenses charged. The criminal court judge who conducted the hearing to accept jurisdiction shall not thereby be rendered disqualified to preside at the criminal trial on the merits.

Appeals from an order of the criminal court pursuant to subsection (e) may be carried to the court of criminal appeals in the manner provided by the Tennessee Rules of Appellate Procedure only following a conviction on the merits of the charge. This is the exclusive method of appeal from a finding that the criminal court accepts jurisdiction. The state may appeal to the court of criminal appeals a finding that the child be remanded to the juvenile court upon the ground of abuse of discretion. Pending the appeal by the state, the criminal court shall make a determination of whether or not the child shall be released on the child's own recognizance, or on bond, or held in the custodial care of the sheriff of the county.

Appeals in all other civil matters heard by the juvenile court shall be governed by the Tennessee Rules of Appellate Procedure.

Acts 1970, ch. 600, § 58; 1976, ch. 745, § 6; 1980, ch. 558, § 1; 1981, ch. 370, § 1; 1981, ch. 449, § 2(24); 1983, ch. 254, § 4; T.C.A., § 37-258; Acts 1985, ch. 328, § 1; 1986, ch. 612, §§ 2, 3; 1992, ch. 704, § 1; 1993, ch. 386, § 1; 1994, ch. 810, §§ 1, 2; 1996, ch. 1079, §§ 73, 104; 1997, ch. 516, § 1; 2009, ch. 235, § 1; 2016, ch. 637, §§ 1, 2; 2019, ch. 312, § 10.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2009, ch. 235, § 1 directed the code commission to change all references Acts 2009, ch. 235, § 1 directed the code commission to change all references from “child support referee” and “juvenile referee” to “child support magistrate” and “juvenile magistrate” and to include all such changes in supplements and replacement volumes for the Tennessee Code Annotated.

Subsection (b) may be affected by T.R.A.P. 3(d).

Amendments. The 2016 amendment in (a) substituted “. Any” for “; and any” following the first instance of “case de novo” in the first sentence; substituted “entry of the juvenile court’s order” for juvenile court’s disposition” at the end of the second sentence; substituted “hearing before a judge” for “rehearing” following “If a” at the beginning of the third sentence; substituted “§37-1-107” for “§37-1-107(e)” in the middle of the third sentence; substituted “the hearing” for “rehearing” following “request” in the middle of the third sentence; and added the last sentence; and in (b), added the last sentence.

The 2019 amendment inserted the second and third sentence in (a).

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 637, § 3. July 1, 2016.

Acts 2019, ch. 312, § 11. May 8, 2019.

Cross-References. Appeals in paternity actions, §36-2-315.

Rule Reference. This section is referred to in the Advisory Commission Comments under Rules 4, 32 and 36 and in the text of Rules 24 and 36 in the Tennessee Rules of Juvenile Procedure.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), §§ 8.2, 8.16, 8.17, 8.30, 8.31, 8.32, 8.40.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 17 Tenn. Juris., Jurisdiction, § 27; 18 Tenn. Juris., Minors, § 11, 20 Tenn. Juris, Parent and Child, § 7.

Law Reviews.

Guidelines for Juvenile Court Practice (Andrew J. Shookhoff), 19 No. 2 Tenn. B.J. 5 (1983).

Attorney General Opinions. Clerk not authorized to refuse to file notice seeking appeal to the wrong court, OAG 96-136 (11/22/96).

Where a defendant charged with contributing to the delinquency of a child submits to the jurisdiction of the juvenile court, waives the right to a jury trial on that charge, and is then convicted, the defendant may file an appeal in either the circuit court or the criminal court, OAG 00-157 (10/17/00).

Pretrial diversion is not available to juveniles who are appealing a finding of delinquency, OAG 05-012 (1/26/05).

37-1-160. Interstate flight by juvenile felon — Applicability of part.

This part shall not apply to any person who violates:

Any law of this state defining a felony, and is at the time of such violation less than eighteen (18) years of age, if such person thereafter flees from this state. Any such person may be proceeded against in the manner otherwise provided by law for proceeding against persons accused of a felony. Upon the return of such person to this state by extradition or otherwise, proceedings shall be commenced in the manner provided for in this part;

Any law of another state defining a felony, and is at the time of such violation less than eighteen (18) years of age, if such person thereafter flees from that state into this state. Any such person may be proceeded against as an adult in the manner provided in the Uniform Criminal Extradition Act, compiled in title 40, chapter 9. Pending rendition to the demanding state, the juvenile shall be detained as provided in § 37-1-116; provided, that nothing in this subdivision (a)(2) shall prevent a juvenile from being released pursuant to § 40-9-106.

This section does not apply in any case where proceedings under the Interstate Compact for Juveniles, compiled in chapter 4, part 1 of this title, are applicable.

Acts 1977, ch. 219, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 37-282, 37-286.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), §§ 2.3, 8.3.

Law Reviews.

A Critical Survey of Developments in Tennessee Family Law in 1976-77, VII. Protection of Minors (Neil P. Cohen), 45 Tenn. L. Rev. 489 (1978).

37-1-161. Reimbursement account.

There is hereby established a reimbursement account, which shall be comprised of such amount of federal funds as are set aside by the commission on children and youth from the state's allocation under the Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention Act formula grant funds and of state funds, if funds for such purpose are appropriated in the general appropriations act. The reimbursement account shall be used to provide financial assistance to counties for removing children from adult jails.

A child who meets the criteria of § 37-1-114(c) for placement in a secure facility and who is taken into custody in a county that does not operate a secure juvenile detention facility may, with the approval of the juvenile court having jurisdiction in the matter, receive alternative services provided through the reimbursement account.

A child who meets the criteria of § 37-1-114(c) for placement in a secure facility and who is taken into custody in a county that has established a secure juvenile detention facility since the passage of legislation effective May 26, 1983, that prohibits the placement of children in adult jails may, with the approval of the juvenile court having jurisdiction in the matter, receive nonsecure alternative services provided through the reimbursement account.

The commission on children and youth shall promulgate regulations in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, for the administration of the reimbursement account. The regulations shall include, but not be limited to, the following factors:

Reporting requirements;

A maximum amount of payment per day;

Maximum length of stay;

Qualifications of service providers; and

Allowable services, which shall include, but not be limited to, the following items:

Transportation;

Secure detention;

Emergency shelter care;

Emergency foster care; and

Attendant care.

The juvenile court having jurisdiction in the matter shall make a determination concerning the ability of a child's parent or guardian to pay for all or part of the services eligible for reimbursement account payment. If the parent or guardian is able to pay for all or part of such services, the court shall require such payment from the parent or guardian.

Acts 1984, ch. 856, § 1; 1986, ch. 837, §§ 3, 4; 1988, ch. 979, § 5; 2012, ch. 1026, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. The Juvenile Justice and Delinquency Prevention Act, referred to in this section, is compiled primarily in U.S.C. titles 18 and 42. The provisions pertaining to federal assistance for state plans under the act are codified in 42 USCS § 5633.

Cross-References. Dependent or neglected children not to be detained in facilities with criminal adults or delinquent children, §37-1-116.

37-1-162. Supplement and account for juvenile court services improvement.

A supplement shall be provided by the state each year to counties for the improvement of juvenile court services. Such supplements shall be administered by the department of children's services and distributed by the department to participating counties. Where more than one (1) court exercises juvenile court jurisdiction within a single county, each court shall receive an equitable share of the county's allocation, as determined by percentage of juvenile court intakes or some other appropriate measure. Each court accepting such funds shall employ a youth services officer to be appointed and supervised by the court.

The department shall establish policies regarding application and reporting procedures, adequate minimum educational requirements for youth services officers, and permissible uses of funds received under this section, including, but not limited to, requirements that such funds shall not be used to supplant funds formerly used by counties for juvenile court services, to pay salaries or personal expenses of juvenile court judges, or to construct or remodel jails or other facilities used for the detention or housing of adults alleged to have committed or been convicted of criminal offenses.

Acts 1984, ch. 856, §§ 2, 3; 2012, ch. 1026, § 2.

Cross-References. Administration of children services, title 37, ch. 3.

37-1-163. Financial obligations.

Financial obligations shall not be assessed against a child in a delinquent or unruly case, including in any order of disposition under § 37-1-131 or § 37-1-132, though this does not affect the assessment of restitution pursuant to § 37-1-131(b). However, the court may order parents, legal custodians, or guardians to pay financial obligations in accordance with the provisions of this part. Restitution to any victim shall be prioritized over all financial obligations.

Failure to pay or timely pay any financial obligations or restitution assessed to the child or the child's parents, guardian, or legal custodian shall not serve as a sole basis for continued court jurisdiction over or supervision of a child.

Failure to pay or timely pay any financial obligations or restitution assessed to the child, child's parents, legal custodians, or guardians shall not serve as a basis for placement in the custody of the department or other removal of the child from the child's home, including the home of a parent, guardian, or legal custodian, for any length of time.

The court shall consider the child's parents, legal custodians, or guardians' financial ability to pay in determining the amount of any financial obligations incurred or assessed by the state or county as described in this part. The court may decline to assess financial obligations if the court determines that assessment would pose financial hardship to the parents, legal custodians, or guardians.

Any financial obligations ordered shall not be referred to any collection service as defined by § 62-20-102.

Acts 2018, ch. 1052, § 47.

Compiler's Notes. Former §§37-1-163 and37-1-164 (Acts 1985 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 6, §§ 3, 4; 1989, ch. 278, § 41), concerning placement in accredited facilities and a plan for a central intake system, were repealed by Acts 1996, ch. 1079, §§ 105 and 183.

Acts 2018, ch. 1052, § 1 provided that the act, which enacted this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Juvenile Justice Reform Act of 2018.”

Acts 2018, ch. 1052, § 55 provided that it is the intent of the general assembly that improvements to the juvenile justice system and expansion of community-based resources for justice-involved children be prioritized, including, but not limited to, evidence-based programs, informal adjustment, diversion, home placement supervision, statewide data collection, early intervention programs and services for children and families, and mental health services, especially in any county underserved with such programs and services.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 1052, § 58. July 1, 2018; provided that for purposes of rulemaking, the act took effect on May 21, 2018.

37-1-164. Risk and needs assessment.

A validated risk and needs assessment shall be used in all delinquent cases post disposition in making decisions and recommendations regarding programming and treatment.

The department may make available a validated tool for use by any juvenile court; however, any juvenile court may instead choose to use a different validated tool.

Any risk and needs assessment tool that is adopted by a juvenile court or the department must periodically undergo a validation study to ensure that the risk and needs assessment is predictive of the risk of reoffending of the population on which the tool is being administered.

Each delinquent child ordered to probation supervision under § 37-1-131 or committed to the custody of the department shall undergo a validated risk and needs assessment within seven (7) days of the court's disposition, excluding nonjudicial days, to inform supervision level, referrals to programs and services, and case planning.

In delinquent cases, the court may order that a risk and needs assessment be conducted prior to disposition if there is written agreement from the child, the child's parent, guardian, or legal custodian, and, if applicable, the child's attorney. A child may undergo such a risk and needs assessment prior to disposition to identify specific factors that predict a child's likelihood of reoffending and, when appropriately addressed, may reduce the likelihood of reoffending, and the results of the risk and needs assessment shall be provided to the court prior to or at the time of the disposition of the child.

Acts 2018, ch. 1052, § 48.

Compiler's Notes. Former §§37-1-163 and37-1-164 (Acts 1985 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 6, §§ 3, 4; 1989, ch. 278, § 41), concerning placement in accredited facilities and a plan for a central intake system, were repealed by Acts 1996, ch. 1079, §§ 105 and 183.

Acts 2018, ch. 1052, § 1 provided that the act, which enacted this section, shall be known and may be cited as the “Juvenile Justice Reform Act of 2018.”

Acts 2018, ch. 1052, § 55 provided that it is the intent of the general assembly that improvements to the juvenile justice system and expansion of community-based resources for justice-involved children be prioritized, including, but not limited to, evidence-based programs, informal adjustment, diversion, home placement supervision, statewide data collection, early intervention programs and services for children and families, and mental health services, especially in any county underserved with such programs and services.

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 1052, § 58. July 1, 2019; provided that for purposes of rulemaking, the act took effect on May 21, 2018.

37-1-165. Contracts among counties to pool juvenile justice supplements.

Any two (2) or more contiguous counties may contract to pool the state juvenile justice supplements received by such counties through the commission on children and youth in order to provide more effective and efficient provision of services, including the employment of one (1) or more persons to provide full-time assistance throughout the contracting counties. Any combination of counties may so contract, but where feasible, counties desiring to pool their supplements should attempt to act within the judicial district of which they constitute a part.

Acts 1985 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 6, § 5.

37-1-166. Orders committing or retaining a child within the custody of the department of children's services — Required determinations.

At any proceeding of a juvenile court, prior to ordering a child committed to or retained within the custody of the department of children's services, the court shall first determine whether reasonable efforts have been made to:

Prevent the need for removal of the child from such child's family; or

Make it possible for the child to return home.

Whenever a juvenile court is making the determination required by subsection (a), the department has the burden of demonstrating that reasonable efforts have been made to prevent the need for removal of the child or to make it possible for the child to return home.

To enable the court to determine whether such reasonable efforts have been made, the department, in a written affidavit to the court in each proceeding where the child's placement is at issue, shall answer each of the following questions:

Is removal of the child from such child's family necessary in order to protect the child, and, if so, then what is the specific risk or risks to the child or family that necessitates removal of the child?;

What specific services are necessary to allow the child to remain in the home or to be returned to the home?;

What services have been provided to assist the family and the child so as to prevent removal or to reunify the family?; and

Has the department had the opportunity to provide services to the family and the child, and, if not, then what are the specific reasons why services could not have been provided?

Whenever a juvenile court is making a determination required by subsection (a), based on all the facts and circumstances presented, the court must find whether:

There is no less drastic alternative to removal;

Reasonable efforts have been made to prevent the need for removal of the child from such child's family or to make it possible for the child to return home; and

Continuation of the child's custody with the parent or legal guardian is contrary to the best interests of the child.

All parties involved in each proceeding shall receive a copy of the department's affidavit and shall have an opportunity to respond as allowed by law.

Unless emergency removal is necessary, the department shall be provided no more than thirty (30) days to investigate or offer services to the family and child in cases where the petition is not filed by the department.

As used in this section, “reasonable efforts” means the exercise of reasonable care and diligence by the department to provide services related to meeting the needs of the child and the family. In determining reasonable efforts to be made with respect to a child, as described in this subdivision (g)(1), and in making such reasonable efforts, the child's health and safety shall be the paramount concern.

Except as provided in subdivision (g)(4), reasonable efforts shall be made to preserve and reunify families:

Prior to the placement of a child in foster care, to prevent or eliminate the need for removing the child from the child's home; and

To make it possible for a child to safely return to the child's home.

If continuation of reasonable efforts of the type described in subdivision (g)(2) is determined to be inconsistent with the permanency plan for the child, reasonable efforts shall be made to place the child in a timely manner in accordance with the permanency plan, and to complete whatever steps are necessary to finalize the permanent placement of the child.

Reasonable efforts of the type described in subdivision (g)(2) shall not be required to be made with respect to a parent of a child if a court of competent jurisdiction has determined that:

The parent has subjected the child that is the subject of the petition or any sibling or half-sibling of the child who is the subject of the petition or any other child residing temporarily or permanently in the home to aggravated circumstances as defined in § 36-1-102;

As set out in § 36-1-113, the parent has:

Committed murder of any sibling or half-sibling of the child who is the subject of the petition or any other child residing temporarily or permanently in the home;

Committed voluntary manslaughter of any sibling or half-sibling of the child who is the subject of the petition or any other child residing temporarily or permanently in the home;

Aided or abetted, attempted, conspired, or solicited to commit such a murder or such a voluntary manslaughter of the child or any sibling or half-sibling of the child who is the subject of the petition or any other child residing temporarily or permanently in the home; or

Committed a felony assault that results in serious bodily injury to the child or any sibling or half-sibling of the child who is the subject of the petition or any other child residing temporarily or permanently in the home; or

The parental rights of the parent to a sibling or half-sibling have been terminated involuntarily.

If reasonable efforts of the type described in subdivision (g)(2) are not made with respect to a child as a result of a determination made by a court of competent jurisdiction in accordance with subdivision (g)(4):

A permanency hearing shall be held for the child within thirty (30) days after the determination; and

Reasonable efforts shall be made to place the child in a timely manner in accordance with the permanency plan, and to complete whatever steps are necessary to finalize the permanent placement of the child.

Reasonable efforts to place a child for adoption or with a legal guardian may be made concurrently with reasonable efforts of the type described in subdivision (g)(2).

In determining whether to continue or restore custody to a parent is in the best interest of a child, the department shall not require a parent to:

Obtain employment if such parent has sufficient resources from other means to care for the child; or

Provide the child with the child's own bedroom, unless there are specific safety or medical reasons that would make placement of the child with another child unsafe.

Acts 1992, ch. 587, § 1; 1996, ch. 1079, § 73; 1998, ch. 1097, § 12; 2013, ch. 354, § 1.

37-1-167. Removal from abusive parent or other party.

If a child has suffered either sexual abuse or aggravated child abuse at the hands of a parent, legal guardian or caregiver, that child shall not be placed back in the care of the abusive party unless the judge finds by clear and convincing evidence that a threat to the child's safety no longer exists.

Acts 1994, ch. 978, § 6.

37-1-168. Juvenile-family crisis intervention programs — General provisions.

The department of children's services shall establish juvenile-family crisis intervention programs to provide continuous twenty-four (24) hour on-call service designed to attend and stabilize juvenile-family crises. The crisis intervention program may, in appropriate cases, work with the family on a short-term basis. The juvenile-family crisis intervention program may make referrals for appropriate services needed to continue resolution of the crisis.

The juvenile-family crisis intervention programs may serve as an alternative to juvenile court in situations where a juvenile-family crisis exists and there has been either:

A request by a parent or juvenile for intervention; or

A referral by a public or private agency, educational institution or any other organization serving children, that has contact with the juvenile or family, and has reason to believe that a family crisis exists.

If there has already been court intervention through the filing of a petition or otherwise, the court may refer appropriate cases to the juvenile-family crisis intervention program. If the department is providing non-custodial services to a child or family, or both, it may provide services through its juvenile-family crisis intervention program if appropriate.

If, in the judgment of the juvenile-family crisis intervention program, a juvenile-family crisis continues to exist despite the provision of crisis intervention services and the exhaustion of appropriate community services, then the juvenile-family crisis intervention program shall, in writing or through sworn testimony, certify to the juvenile court that there is no other less drastic measure than court intervention. The court may then proceed by accepting a petition or acting on a pending petition and hold a hearing to determine what is in the best interest of the child consistent with § 37-1-132 and any other applicable laws under this part.

Acts 1994, ch. 1000, §§ 2, 4; 1996, ch. 1079, § 106; 2008, ch. 906, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1994, ch. 1000, § 1 provided that the intent of the general assembly in enacting this section is to implement services to reduce the number of unruly children, as defined in T.C.A. §37-1-102, who are referred to juvenile court and to reduce the number of unruly children who are placed in state custody.

The office of children's services administration in the department of finance and administration is responsible for implementing the provisions of Acts 1994, ch. 1000. See Executive Order No. 58 (June 29, 1994).

37-1-169. Referrals by juvenile court to crisis intervention program.

By promulgation of local rules of the juvenile court, a referral may be made to the department of children's services juvenile-family crisis intervention program in the following instances:

Where there is an allegation that a child is unruly; or

Where there is an allegation that a juvenile-family crisis exists.

Nothing in this section shall preclude the court or the department from taking any necessary action that shall be required to provide to a child any protective services, including, but not limited to, emergency protective custody.

Acts 1994, ch. 1000, § 3; 1996, ch. 1079, § 107.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1994, ch. 1000, § 1 provided that the intent of the general assembly in enacting this section is to implement services to reduce the number of unruly children, as defined in T.C.A. §37-1-102, who are referred to juvenile court and to reduce the number of unruly children who are placed in state custody.

The office of children's services administration in the department of finance and administration is responsible for implementing the provisions of Acts 1994, ch. 1000. See Executive Order No. 58 (June 29, 1994).

37-1-170. Joinder of parents or guardians in juvenile court actions.

A juvenile court may, when the court determines that it is in the best interests of the child, join the child's parent or guardian and the person with whom the child resides, if other than the child's parent or guardian, as a respondent to a juvenile court action and may issue a summons requiring the parent or guardian and the person with whom the child resides, if other than the child's parent or guardian, to appear with the child at all proceedings under this chapter involving the child. If the parent or guardian of any child cannot be found, the court, in its discretion, may proceed with the case without the presence of such parent or guardian.

For the purposes of this section, “parent” includes a natural parent who has sole or joint custody, regardless of whether the parent is designated as the primary residential custodian, or an adoptive parent. This subsection (b) does not apply to any person whose parental rights have been terminated pursuant to this title or the parent of an emancipated minor.

For the purposes of this section, “emancipated minor” has the same meaning as set forth in § 39-11-106.

The summons shall require the person or persons having the physical custody of the juvenile, if other than a parent or guardian, to appear and to bring the juvenile before the court at a time and place stated.

Whenever a parent or guardian or person with whom the juvenile resides, if other than the parent or guardian, who has received a summons to appear fails, without good cause, to appear on any date set by the court, a bench warrant shall be issued for the parent, guardian or person with whom the juvenile resides and the parent, guardian or person with whom the juvenile resides shall be subject to contempt.

For purposes of subsection (d), good cause for failing to appear includes, but is not limited to, a situation where a parent or guardian:

Does not have physical custody of the child and resides outside Tennessee;

Has physical custody of the child, but resides outside of Tennessee and appearing in court will result in undue hardship to such parent or guardian; or

Resides in Tennessee, but is outside of the state at the time of the juvenile proceeding for reasons other than avoiding appearance before the court and appearing in court will result in undue hardship to such parent or guardian.

This section shall not be applicable to any proceeding in a case that has been transferred to the criminal court pursuant to the provisions of § 37-1-134.

The general assembly hereby declares that every parent or guardian whose child is the subject of a juvenile proceeding under this title should attend any such proceeding as often as is practicable.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to create a right for any juvenile to have a parent or guardian present at any proceeding at which such juvenile is present.

Acts 1995, ch. 191, § 1.

37-1-171. Written orders — Presumptions — Forms.

When a court desires to commit a child to the department of children's services under this part, it shall do so by written order that finds that the child has been adjudicated dependent and neglected, unruly, delinquent or meets the criteria in § 37-1-175. If the written order fails to make a specific adjudication of the child, it shall be presumed that the court has found the child dependent and neglected. Commitments to the department shall be consistent with all other laws regarding adjudication and commitment to the department. Nothing in this part shall be interpreted as prohibiting taking children into emergency protective services custody without a prior adjudication.

When a court commits a child to the department, the court shall address the issue of child support under § 37-1-151(b).

The department shall prepare a form for the court to use when committing a child to custody. Such form shall be completed and transmitted along with the court's commitment order to the department at the time of the child's commitment.

Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 72; 2000, ch. 947, § 8G.

37-1-172. Use and disposition of federal funds.

The court shall not direct the department of children's services' or its contractors' or agents' use or disposition of any federal funds for which any child or person in the care of the department is eligible or may receive and for which the department may be payee on behalf of such child or person including, but not limited to, Social Security survivors benefits under Title II of the federal Social Security Act, compiled in 42 U.S.C. § 401 et seq., and supplemental security income benefits under Title XVI of the federal Social Security Act, compiled in 42 U.S.C. § 1381 et seq., foster care or adoption assistance benefits received pursuant to Title IV-E of the Adoption Assistance Act of 1980 of the federal Social Security Act, compiled in 42 U.S.C. § 670 et seq., or veteran's benefits, railroad retirement benefits or black lung benefits or any successor entitlements that are provided by federal law.

Funds received under any federal benefits programs shall be processed, utilized and accounted for by the department pursuant only to federal regulations or federal court orders governing those programs.

Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 75.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1996, ch. 1079, § 184 provided:

“Any provision of this act, or the application thereof, which is inconsistent with federal law, rule or regulation shall be deemed to be construed as being consistent with federal law, rule or regulation.”